Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Penalties

146.990.
Penalties.

Any person, corporation, city, county or other governmental subdivision who violates any of the provisions of KRS 146.200 to 146.360 shall be liable to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for said violation and in addition may be enjoined from continuing said violation. Each day upon which such violation occurs or continues shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who trespasses on private land within the boundary of a designated wild river shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall be subject to a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Violations of KRS 146.410 to 146.530 or of any rule or regulation adopted and published by the office pursuant to the provisions of KRS 146.410 to 146.530, shall be subject to the penalties and sanctions presently provided for in KRS Chapter 224 or as may be amended.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 117, § 17; 1976, ch. 118, § 27; 1976, ch. 197, § 6 (2nd sentence); 2018 ch. 29, § 47, effective July 14, 2018.